Utah statutes.
41-1a-906.   Repair or replacement of odometer -- Notice affixed to motor vehicle.

(1)  Sections 41-1a-902 through 41-1a-905 do not prevent the repair or replacement of an odometer, provided the mileage indicated on the odometer remains the same as before the repair or replacement.

(2)  Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before the repair or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to zero and a notice in writing shall be affixed by the owner to the left door frame of the motor vehicle specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date it was repaired or replaced.

